local/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
    <pardef n="trass/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lets</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>els</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cyk/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>larnas</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lernas</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>larna</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerna</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lars</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lers</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elns</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eln</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>els</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ank/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>larnas</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>larna</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lars</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elns</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eln</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>els</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="form/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lernas</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerna</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lers</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elns</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eln</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>els</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="toff/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lornas</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lorna</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lors</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lor</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elns</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eln</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>els</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="saltvatt/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nets</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>net</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ord/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>narnas</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>narna</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nars</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="barncykel"><i>barncyk</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="damcykel"><i>damcyk</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="herrcykel"><i>herrcyk</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pojkcykel"><i>pojkcyk</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flickcykel"><i>flickcyk</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vinkel"><i>vink</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ankel"><i>ank</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apostel"><i>apost</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="artikel"><i>artik</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bibel"><i>bib</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bittermandel"><i>bittermand</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buffel"><i>buff</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cirkel"><i>cirk</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cykel"><i>cyk</i><par n="cyk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="formel"><i>form</i><par n="form/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hyvel"><i>hyv</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kabel"><i>kab</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kjortel"><i>kjort</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mandel"><i>mand</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="matsedel"><i>matsed</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motorcykel"><i>motorcyk</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nagel"><i>nag</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nyckel"><i>nyck</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="orden"><i>ord</i><par n="ord/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="orgel"><i>org</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puckel"><i>puck</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sadel"><i>sad</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saltvatten"><i>saltvatt</i><par n="saltvatt/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skruvmejsel"><i>skruvmejs</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skyffel"><i>skyff</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spegel"><i>speg</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spindel"><i>spind</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="titel"><i>tit</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="toffel"><i>toff</i><par n="toff/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trassel"><i>trass</i><par n="trass/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="triangel"><i>triang</i><par n="ank/el__n"/></e>
